New York, session 2025-2026, A4477.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 606 of the laws of 2006, amending the 2 volunteer firefighters' benefit law, relating to creating a presumption 3 relating to certain lung disabilities incurred by volunteer firefight- 4 ers, as amended by section 1 of item BB of subpart B of part XXX of 5 chapter 58 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately [and shall expire and be 7 deemed repealed June 30, 2025]. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00387-01-5